Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1036YH (1) 91 jm/md H.F. 75 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 427.7 Petition for abatement of 1 taxes ââ emergency services member. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âEmergency services memberâ or âmemberâ means a fire 4 fighter, a peace officer as defined in section 801.4, a 5 correctional officer, or an emergency medical care provider 6 as defined in section 147A.1. An âemergency services memberâ 7 includes a volunteer emergency services provider as defined in 8 section 100B.14, subsection 2. 9 b. âHomesteadâ means the same as defined in section 425.11. 10 2. a. The spouse of an emergency services member who was 11 killed in the line of duty may file a petition with the board 12 of supervisors of the county where the petitionerâs homestead 13 is located, requesting abatement of property taxes and special 14 assessments assessed on the petitionerâs homestead by a taxing 15 authority. 16 b. The petition shall be duly sworn to and shall contain all 17 the following criteria: 18 (1) A certification of good standing from the chief officer 19 of the entity or volunteer agency of the deceased member. 20 (2) Proof that the death of the member was the direct and 21 proximate result of a traumatic injury incurred in the line of 22 duty. 23 (3) Any other information as the board may require to verify 24 the petitionerâs eligibility. 25 c. A petitioner is not eligible for the abatement authorized 26 under this section under any of the following circumstances: 27 (1) The death was caused by the intentional misconduct of 28 the petitioner or by the memberâs intent to cause their own 29 death. 30 (2) The member was voluntarily intoxicated at the time of 31 death. 32 (3) The member was performing their duties in a grossly 33 negligent manner at the time of death. 34 (4) A petitioner who would otherwise be entitled to 35 -1- LSB 1036YH (1) 91 jm/md 1/ 4 H.F. 75 abatement under this section was, through the petitionerâs 1 actions, a substantial contributing factor to the death of the 2 member. 3 3. The petition filed with the board of supervisors shall be 4 on a form prescribed by the department of revenue. Following 5 receipt of the petition, the board of supervisors shall 6 forward a copy of the petition to the governing body of each 7 taxing authority that levies taxes or special assessments on 8 the homestead. If the board of supervisors determines that 9 the petitioner satisfies the criteria under this section and 10 approves the abatement petition, the abatement shall apply to 11 all applicable taxes and special assessments on the homestead, 12 excluding those for which an objection by the governing body of 13 the taxing authority was filed with the board of supervisors 14 within thirty days of the board forwarding a copy of the 15 petition to the governing body. The board of supervisors may 16 order the county treasurer to abate the collection of the 17 taxes and special assessments that are assessed against the 18 petitionerâs homestead for the assessment year during which the 19 petition is filed and, if specified by the board, the taxes and 20 special assessments for one or more future years, subject to 21 the petitioner continuing to meet the qualifications of this 22 section. 23 4. The amount of the abatement shall be apportioned among 24 such property tax levies and special assessments in the 25 proportion that each applicable levy or assessment makes up the 26 total amount of such taxes and special assessments due on the 27 homestead by the applicable taxing authorities for which an 28 objection was not filed or approved. 29 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 30 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 31 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 32 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 33 1, 2025. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -2- LSB 1036YH (1) 91 jm/md 2/ 4 H.F. 75 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill authorizes the abatement of property taxes and 3 special assessments owed on property owned by the surviving 4 spouse of an emergency services member killed in the line of 5 duty. 6 The bill defines âemergency services memberâ or âmemberâ to 7 mean a fire fighter, a peace officer as defined in Code section 8 801.4, a correctional officer, or an emergency medical care 9 provider as defined in Code section 147A.1. An âemergency 10 services memberâ also includes a volunteer emergency services 11 provider as defined in Code section 100B.14(2). 12 Under the bill, the spouse of an emergency services 13 member (petitioner) who died in the line of duty may file a 14 petition with the board of supervisors of the county where 15 the petitionerâs homestead is located, requesting abatement 16 of property taxes and special assessments assessed on the 17 petitionerâs homestead by a taxing authority. 18 The petition filed with the board of supervisors shall be 19 duly sworn and shall contain a certification of good standing 20 from the chief officer of the entity or volunteer agency of the 21 deceased member and proof that the death of the member was the 22 direct and proximate result of a traumatic injury incurred in 23 the line of duty. 24 Following receipt of the petition, the board of supervisors 25 shall forward a copy of the petition to the governing body of 26 each taxing authority that levies taxes or special assessments 27 on the homestead. If the board of supervisors determines a 28 petitioner has satisfied all relevant criteria and approves 29 the abatement, the abatement shall apply to all applicable 30 taxes and special assessments on the homestead, excluding 31 those for which an objection by the governing body of the 32 taxing authority was filed with or approved by the board of 33 supervisors within 30 days of the board forwarding a copy of 34 the petition. The board of supervisors may order the abatement 35 -3- LSB 1036YH (1) 91 jm/md 3/ 4 H.F. 75 of the taxes and special assessments that are assessed against 1 the petitionerâs homestead for the assessment year during which 2 the petition is filed and, if specified by the board, the taxes 3 and special assessments for one or more future years, subject 4 to the petitioner continuing to meet the qualifications of the 5 bill. 6 The bill does not apply under certain circumstances 7 including if the deceased member ended their own life, was 8 grossly negligent, or intoxicated, or the actions of the 9 petitioner were a substantial contributing factor in the death 10 of the member. 11 The bill also specifies the method of apportioning the 12 abatement among each applicable levy and special assessment. 13 The bill takes effect upon enactment and applies 14 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 15 1, 2025. 16 -4- LSB 1036YH (1) 91 jm/md 4/ 4